Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201417-605
Clerk; duties.

The
city or village clerk shall have the custody of all laws and ordinances and shall keep a correct
journal of the proceedings of the council or board of trustees. After the period of time
specified by the State Records Administrator pursuant to the Records Management Act, the city or village
clerk may transfer such journal of the proceedings of the council or board
of trustees to the State Archives of the Nebraska State Historical Society for permanent preservation. He or she shall also perform
such other duties as may be required by the ordinances of the city.

Laws 1879, § 63, p. 208;

R.S.1913, § 5147;

C.S.1922, § 4322;

C.S.1929, § 17-513;

R.S.1943, § 17-605;

Laws 1973, LB 224, § 5;

Laws 2013, LB112, § 3.

Records Management Act, see section 84-1220.

City has power to appropriate money for an audit of the accounts of the clerk. Campbell Co. v. City of Harvard, 123 Neb. 539, 243 N.W. 653 (1932).

This section does not specifically require the recording of reading of city ordinances. Hull v. City of Humboldt, 107 Neb. 326, 186 N.W. 78 (1921).